Utah statutes.
73-10-31.   Allocation of funds for credit enhancement and interest buy-down agreements.

(1)  Of the combined expenditures from the Water Resources Cities Water Loan Fund and Water Resources Conservation and Development Fund authorized by the Board of Water Resources each year, at least 10% shall be allocated for credit enhancement and interest buy-down agreements.

(2)  The requirement specified in Subsection (1) shall apply only so long as sales and use tax is transferred to the Water Resources Conservation and Development Fund as provided in Section 59-12-103.

